Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity
Act:

(1) Agent means any person authorized by the Tax Commissioner
to purchase and affix stamps or cigarette tax meter impressions on packages
of cigarettes under sections 77-2601 to 77-2615;

(2) Cigarette has the same meaning as in section 77-2601;

(3) Consumer testing means an assessment of cigarettes that
is conducted by a manufacturer, or under the control or direction of a manufacturer,
for the purpose of evaluating consumer acceptance of the cigarettes;

(4) Manufacturer means:

(a) Any entity which manufactures or otherwise produces cigarettes
or causes cigarettes to be manufactured or produced anywhere that such manufacturer
intends to sell in this state, including cigarettes intended to be sold in
the United States through an importer;

(b) The first purchaser anywhere that intends to resell in
the United States cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the original manufacturer
or maker does not intend to be sold in the United States; or

(c) Any entity that becomes a successor of an entity described
in subdivision (4)(a) or (b) of this section;

(5) Quality control and quality assurance program means the
laboratory procedures implemented to ensure that operator bias, systematic
and nonsystematic methodological errors, and equipment-related problems do
not affect the results of the testing. Such a program ensures that the testing
repeatability remains within the required repeatability values stated in section
69-503 for all test trials used to certify cigarettes in accordance with the Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Act;

(6) Repeatability means the range of values within which the
repeat results of cigarette test trials from a single laboratory will fall
ninety-five percent of the time;

(7) Retail dealer means any person, other than a manufacturer
or wholesale dealer, engaged in selling cigarettes or tobacco products;

(8) Sale means any transfer for consideration, exchange, barter,
gift, offer for sale, or distribution in any manner or by any means whatsoever;

(9) Sell means to sell or to offer or agree to do the same;
and

(10) Wholesale dealer means any person, other than a manufacturer,
who sells cigarettes or tobacco products to retail dealers or other persons
for purposes of resale and any person who owns, operates, or maintains one
or more cigarette or tobacco product vending machines in, at, or upon premises
owned or occupied by any other person.

Laws 2009, LB198, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 3.